apertium-br-fr/apertium-br-fr.fr.metadix
    <pardef n="nui/re__vblex">
            
<e><p><l></l><r>re<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
            
<e><p><l></l><r>re<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
            
<e><p><l></l><r>re<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
            
<e><p><l></l><r>re<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
            
<e><p><l>ra</l><r>re<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
            
<e><p><l>rai</l><r>re<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
            
<e><p><l>raient</l><r>re<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
            
<e><p><l>rais</l><r>re<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
            
<e><p><l>rais</l><r>re<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
            
<e><p><l>rait</l><r>re<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
            
<e><p><l>ras</l><r>re<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
            
<e><p><l>re</l><r>re<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
            
<e><p><l>rez</l><r>re<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
            
<e><p><l>riez</l><r>re<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
            
<e><p><l>rions</l><r>re<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
            
<e><p><l>rons</l><r>re<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
            
<e><p><l>ront</l><r>re<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
            
<e><p><l>s</l><r>re<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
            
<e><p><l>s</l><r>re<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__encimp"/></e>
            
<e><p><l>s</l><r>re<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
            
<e><p><l>s</l><r>re<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
            
<e><p><l>saient</l><r>re<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
            
<e><p><l>sais</l><r>re<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
            
<e><p><l>sais</l><r>re<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
            
<e><p><l>sait</l><r>re<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
            
<e><p><l>sant</l><r>re<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r></p></e>
            
<e><p><l>sant</l><r>re<s n="vblex"/><s n="ppres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="ND"/></r></p></e>
            
<e><p><l>se</l><r>re<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
            
<e><p><l>se</l><r>re<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
            
<e><p><l>sent</l><r>re<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
            
<e><p><l>sent</l><r>re<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
            
<e><p><l>ses</l><r>re<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
            
<e><p><l>sez</l><r>re<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
            
<e><p><l>sez</l><r>re<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__encimp"/></e>
            
<e><p><l>sez</l><r>re<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
            
<e><p><l>siez</l><r>re<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
            
<e><p><l>siez</l><r>re<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
            
<e><p><l>sions</l><r>re<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
            
<e><p><l>sions</l><r>re<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
            
<e><p><l>sirent</l><r>re<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
            
<e><p><l>sis</l><r>re<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
            
<e><p><l>sis</l><r>re<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
            
<e><p><l>sisse</l><r>re<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
            
<e><p><l>sissent</l><r>re<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
            
<e><p><l>sisses</l><r>re<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
            
<e><p><l>sissiez</l><r>re<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
            
<e><p><l>sissions</l><r>re<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
            
<e><p><l>sit</l><r>re<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
            
<e><p><l>sons</l><r>re<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
            
<e><p><l>sons</l><r>re<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__encimp"/></e>
            
<e><p><l>sons</l><r>re<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
            
<e><p><l>sîmes</l><r>re<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
            
<e><p><l>sît</l><r>re<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
            
<e><p><l>sîtes</l><r>re<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
            
<e><p><l>t</l><r>re<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="nul__det">
            
<e><p><l></l><r><s n="det"/><s n="ind"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
            
<e><p><l>le</l><r><s n="det"/><s n="ind"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="numeros">
            
<e><re>[0-9]+([.,][0-9]+)?%</re><p><l></l><r><s n="num"/><s n="percent"/></r></p></e>
            
<e><re>[0-9]+([.,][0-9]+)?</re><p><l></l><r><s n="num"/></r></p></e>
<e r="RL"><re>[0-9]+([.,][0-9]+)?</re><p><l></l><r><s n="num"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
<e r="RL"><re>[0-9]+([.,][0-9]+)?</re><p><l></l><r><s n="num"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
<e r="RL"><p><l>1</l><r>1<s n="num"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

          <e lm="nuire"><i>nui</i><par n="nui/re__vblex"/></e>
          <e lm="nul" r="LR"><i>nul</i><par n="nul__det"/></e>
<e><par n="numeros"/></e>
